Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 2 War Veterans Home

Editor’s notes.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1987, p. 742), the General Assembly directed the Department of Veteran Services to designate the Georgia War Veterans Nursing Home as the Joel E. Scott Building and to affix an appropriate plaque at the entrance of the building identifying it as the “Joel E. Scott Building.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Fee for residency in a facility of the Georgia State War Veterans Home, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Veteran’s Services, Chapter 690-1.

38-4-50.
“War veterans” defined.

As used in Code Sections 38-4-51 and 38-4-52, the term “war veterans” means any veterans who were discharged under other than dishonorable conditions and who served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States or on active duty in a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States, including the National Guard, during wartime or during the period beginning January 31, 1955, and ending on August 1, 1990, or during the period beginning January 1, 1947, and ending on June 26, 1950.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, Ex. Sess., p. 18, § 3; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1247, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 719, § 1/HB 322; Ga. L. 2020, p. 355, § 1/HB 907.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, added “, or during the period beginning January 1, 1947, and ending on June 26, 1950” at the end.

Editor’s notes.

This section originally referred to the ending date as the date determined by presidential proclamation declaring a cessation of the Vietnam era, which date was declared to be May 7, 1975. See Presidential Proclamation No. 4373, May 7, 1975, 40 F.R. 20257. See also

38 U.S.C. § 101

(29).

38-4-51.
Established; locations; adjacent facilities integral part thereof.

There is established the Georgia State War Veterans’ Home, which shall be available for the use and care of disabled war veterans discharged under other than dishonorable conditions. For the purpose of securing treatment or hospitalization, the adjacent facilities of Central State Hospital are established as an integral part of the Georgia State War Veterans’ Home and may be utilized to care for eligible veterans.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, Ex. Sess., p. 18, § 1.

38-4-52.
Veterans Service Board — Administer home’s facilities.

The facilities of the Georgia State War Veterans’ Home shall be under the control and administration of the Veterans Service Board.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, Ex. Sess., p. 18, § 2; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1150, § 1.

38-4-53.
Veterans Service Board — Authorized revenue sources, expenditures, and hiring; other state bodies to cooperate.

The Veterans Service Board is designated as the agency of this state to receive federal aid under Title 38, U.S.C., Sections 641 and 642, as amended, and is authorized and directed to receive from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or any other agency of the United States government authorized to pay federal aid to states for soldiers’ homes under Title 38, U.S.C., Sections 641 and 642, as amended, and of any other federal law or act of Congress providing for the payment of funds to states for the care of or support of disabled soldiers and sailors in the state homes. The Veterans Service Board is authorized to receive from any source gifts, contributions, bequests, and individual reimbursements, the receipt of which does not exclude any other source of revenue. All funds received by the Veterans Service Board shall be expended for the care and support of disabled war veterans. At the discretion of the Veterans Service Board, funds received from any source by the Veterans Service Board may be expended in any manner whatsoever for the care and support of disabled war veterans, including the purchase of supplies, food, clothing, equipment, personal and real property, and the erection of suitable buildings, as well as for necessary repairs on existing facilities of the Georgia State War Veterans’ Home. The Veterans Service Board is authorized to hire employees, including technical personnel, as necessary in order to carry out this part. At the request of the Veterans Service Board, every officer and employee of the state government shall furnish all information in their possession necessary to enable the Veterans Service Board to carry out properly this part.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, Ex. Sess., p. 18, § 6; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1150, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 45, § 1.

38-4-54.
Veterans Service Board — Funds received from federal sources expended to aid war veterans; no limitation on additional state aid.

All federal funds received by the Veterans Service Board and paid into the state treasury are continually appropriated to the Veterans Service Board in the exact amounts, for the care and support of disabled war veterans, as received from the federal government. This is not intended as a limitation upon the power of the General Assembly to make such additional appropriation to provide for the care and support of disabled veterans as it may from time to time see fit to make.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, Ex. Sess., p. 18, § 7; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1150, § 4.

38-4-55.
Admissions and discharges; rules and regulations concerning.

Admissions to and discharges from any facility of the Georgia State War Veterans’ Home shall be under the control of the governing authority of the facility concerned under the laws and department rules and regulations in force at the time application for admission or for discharge is presented; provided, however, that a war veteran shall not be eligible for admission to the Georgia War Veterans’ Nursing Home or the Georgia State War Veterans’ Home unless such war veteran:

Has been a resident of this state for a period of at least two years immediately prior to application for admission; or

Is a current resident of this state and has been a resident of this state for at least five years out of the last 15 years prior to application for admission.

Provided, further, that the Veterans Service Board may admit and discharge veterans to the Georgia State War Veterans’ Home who qualify for care and treatment under Title 38, U.S.C., Section 101 (19) and Section 641. The Veterans Service Board may adopt appropriate rules consistent with accepted medical considerations to determine if a war veteran qualifies under this subsection.

The governing authority of such facility shall exercise appropriate police power and power of restraint over veterans at the Georgia State War Veterans’ Home consistent with policies applied to other patients under their care or responsibility.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, Ex. Sess., p. 18, § 4; Ga. L. 1969, p. 633, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 796, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 587, § 1/HB 180.

38-4-56.
Fee for residency in State War Veterans’ Home.

The Veterans Service Board is authorized to provide by rule and regulation for a reasonable fee for residency in and services provided by a facility of the Georgia State War Veterans’ Home. The board is authorized to provide by rule and regulation for a full or partial waiver of such fees based on economic need. Such fee waiver shall be established on a sliding scale based on established criteria, including, without limitation, consideration of assets, income, and other resources.

The Department of Veterans Service is authorized to receive, as full or partial payment of any fees charged by a facility of the Georgia State War Veterans’ Home, the assignment of any state or federal benefit including, without limitation, aid and attendance benefits paid by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-4-56

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 684, § 1/HB 535.